Texas, session 892, HB43.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Section 443.205, Health and Safety Code, is amended by amending Subsection (a) and adding Subsections (a-1) and (a-2) to read as follows: (a)  Before a consumable hemp product that contains or is marketed as containing more than trace amounts of cannabinoids may be distributed or sold, the product must be labeled in the manner provided by this section with the following information: (1)  batch identification number; (2)  batch date; (3)  product name; (4)  a uniform resource locator (URL) that provides or links to a certificate of analysis for the product or each hemp-derived ingredient of the product; (5)  the name of the product's manufacturer; [and] (6)  a certification that the delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol concentration of the product or each hemp-derived ingredient of the product is not more than 0.3 percent; and (7)  a warning under Subsection (a-1) or (a-2), if applicable. (a-1)  Each consumable hemp product intended for eating or ingestion that contains more than 10 micrograms of delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol in each gram of the product must include one of the following warnings, selected at random or based on rotation approved by the department: "WARNING:  KEEP OUT OF REACH OF CHILDREN. CONSUMABLE HEMP PRODUCTS CAN CAUSE CANNABIS POISONING THAT CAN BE LIFE-THREATENING TO CHILDREN, ESPECIALLY TO THOSE YOUNGER THAN FIVE YEARS OLD." "WARNING:  IT CAN TAKE UP TO FOUR HOURS TO FEEL EFFECTS FROM EATING OR DRINKING A CONSUMABLE HEMP PRODUCT.  CONSUMING MORE BEFORE FEELING AN EFFECT CAN CAUSE CANNABIS POISONING, INCLUDING SEVERE ANXIETY AND PANIC ATTACKS." "WARNING:  USING CANNABIS WHILE YOUNGER THAN 25 YEARS OF AGE CAN HARM BRAIN DEVELOPMENT.  THIS CAN WORSEN YOUR ATTENTION, CONCENTRATION, AND MEMORY, ESPECIALLY WHEN USING CANNABIS EVERY DAY OR MOST DAYS." "WARNING:  USING CANNABIS WHILE YOUNGER THAN 25 YEARS OF AGE INCREASES YOUR RISK OF MENTAL DISORDERS LIKE PSYCHOSIS AND SCHIZOPHRENIA. THE MORE OFTEN YOU USE, THE GREATER THE RISK." "WARNING:  CANNABIS CAN CAUSE PSYCHOTIC SYMPTOMS LIKE SEVERE PARANOIA.  THE RISK IS GREATEST IN PEOPLE YOUNGER THAN 25 YEARS OF AGE OR WHEN USING PRODUCTS WITH HIGHER AMOUNTS OF TETRAHYDROCANNABINOL (THC)." "WARNING:  USING CANNABIS EVERY DAY OR MOST DAYS CAN LEAD TO DEPENDENCE.  DEPENDENCE ALSO INCREASES YOUR RISK OF ANXIETY AND DEPRESSION." "WARNING:  CANNABIS CAN BE ADDICTIVE. THE HIGHER THE AMOUNT OF TETRAHYDROCANNABINOL (THC), THE GREATER THE RISK." "WARNING: LONG-TERM CANNABIS USE INCREASES YOUR RISK OF ANXIETY AND DEPRESSION. THE MORE OFTEN YOU USE, THE GREATER THE RISK." "WARNING:  THE HIGHER THE AMOUNT OF TETRAHYDROCANNABINOL (THC), THE GREATER THE RISK OF ADVERSE EFFECTS.  THESE CAN INCLUDE PARANOIA, ANXIETY, AND DEPENDENCE." "WARNING:  DO NOT USE CANNABIS IF PREGNANT OR BREASTFEEDING. USING CANNABIS CAN HARM YOUR BABY'S GROWTH AND DEVELOPMENT." "WARNING: DO NOT DRIVE UNDER THE INFLUENCE OF CANNABIS.  IT PUTS YOUR LIFE AND OTHER PEOPLE'S LIVES AT RISK." (a-2)  Each consumable hemp product for topical use that contains more than 10 micrograms of delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol in each gram of the product must include the following warning: "WARNING:  DO NOT SWALLOW OR APPLY INTERNALLY OR TO BROKEN, IRRITATED, OR ITCHING SKIN.  THERE MAY BE HEALTH EFFECTS AND RISKS FROM CANNABIS TOPICALS THAT ARE NOT FULLY KNOWN OR UNDERSTOOD." SECTION 2.  The change in law made by this Act applies only to a consumable hemp product that is distributed or sold on or after the effective date of this Act. SECTION 3.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.